Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska16-661
Construction and repair; materials.

The mayor and council may construct and repair, or cause and compel the construction and repair, of sidewalks in such city of such material and in such manner as they may deem necessary.

Laws 1901, c. 18, § 48, LV, p. 259;

Laws 1901, c. 19, § 4, p. 307;

Laws 1907, c. 13, § 1, p. 111;

R.S.1913, § 4945;

C.S.1922, § 4114;

C.S.1929, § 16-643;

R.S.1943, § 16-661.